Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.152

Definitions.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Community-based early learning providers" includes for-profit and nonprofit licensed providers of child care and preschool programs.

(2) "Program" means the program of early learning established in *RCW 43.215.141 for eligible children who are three and four years of age.

[2010 c 231 s 2. Formerly RCW 43.215.140.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 43.215.141 was recodified as RCW 43.215.455 pursuant to 2013 2nd sp.s. c 16 s 5. RCW 43.215.455 was subsequently recodified as RCW 43.216.555 pursuant to 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 821, effective July 1, 2018.